test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-14laiwh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - laiõh: # Noun (14) laiõh 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     laiõh+N+Sg+Nom: laiõh
     laiõh+N+Sg+Gen: laidõ
     laiõh+N+Sg+Par: laiõht
     laiõh+N+Sg+Ill: laidõhe
     laiõh+N+Sg+Ine: laidõn
     laiõh+N+Sg+Ela: laidõst
     laiõh+N+Sg+All: laidõlõ
     laiõh+N+Sg+Ade: laidõl
     laiõh+N+Sg+Abl: laidõlt
     laiõh+N+Sg+Tra: laidõs
     laiõh+N+Sg+Ter: laidõniq
     laiõh+N+Sg+Abe: laidõldaq
     laiõh+N+Sg+Com: laidõgaq
     laiõh+N+Pl+Nom: laidõq
     laiõh+N+Pl+Gen: laididõ
     laiõh+N+Pl+Par: laidit
     laiõh+N+Pl+Ill: laidihe
     laiõh+N+Pl+Ine: laidin
     laiõh+N+Pl+Ela: laidist
     laiõh+N+Pl+All: laidilõ
     laiõh+N+Pl+Ade: laidil
     laiõh+N+Pl+Abl: laidilt
     laiõh+N+Pl+Tra: laidis
     laiõh+N+Pl+Ter: laidiniq
     laiõh+N+Pl+Abe: laidildaq
     laiõh+N+Pl+Com: laididõgaq
